hr-HR: Broj polova prekidača: Dvopolni (DP); Jednopolni (SP); Tropolni (3P); Ostalo
ko: 스위치 폴 수: 2극(DP); 단극(SP); 3극(3P); 기타
pt-PT: Número de polos do interruptor: Polo duplo (DP); Polo único (SP); Polo triplo (3P); Outro
sl-SI: Število polov stikala: Dvojni pol (DP); Enojni pol (SP); Trojni pol (3P); Drugo
es: Número de polos del interruptor: Doble polo (DP); Unipolar (SP); Tripolar (3P); Otro
nb: Antall bryterpoler: Topolt (DP); Enpolt (SP); Trepolt (3P); Annet
bg-BG: Брой полюси на превключвателя: Двуполюсен (DP); Еднополюсен (SP); Триполюсен (3P); Друго
ja: スイッチ極数: 2極 (DP); 単極 (SP); 3極 (3P); その他
de: Anzahl der Pole im Schalter: Zweipolig (DP); Einpolig (SP); Dreipolig (3P); Andere
vi: Số cực của công tắc: Hai cực (DP); Đơn cực (SP); Ba cực (3P); Khác
hu: Kapcsoló pólusainak száma: Kétpólusú (DP); Egypólusú (SP); Hárompólusú (3P); Egyéb
da: Antal afbryderpoler: 2-polet (DP); 1-polet (SP); 3-polet (3P); Andet
ro-RO: Număr de poli ai comutatorului: Bipolar (DP); Unipolar (SP); Tripolar (3P); Altele
fi: Kytkimen napojen lukumäärä: Kaksinapainen (DP); Yksinapainen (SP); Kolminapainen (3P); Muu
sk-SK: Počet pólov spínača: Dvojpólový (DP); Jednopólový (SP); Trojpólový (3P); Iný
pl: Liczba biegunów przełącznika: Dwubiegunowy (DP); Jednobiegunowy (SP); Trójbiegunowy (3P); Inne
en: Number of switch poles: Double pole (DP); Single pole (SP); Triple pole (3P); Other
th: จำนวนขั้วสวิตช์: ขั้วคู่ (DP); ขั้วเดี่ยว (SP); สามขั้ว (3P); อื่นๆ
ru: Количество полюсов переключателя: Двухполюсный (DP); Однополюсный (SP); Трехполюсный (3P); Другое
zh-CN: 开关极数: 双极 (DP); 单极 (SP); 三极 (3P); 其他
cs: Počet pólů spínače: Dvoupólový (DP); Jednopólový (SP); Trojpólový (3P); Ostatní
el: Αριθμός πόλων του διακόπτη: Διπλός πόλος (DP); Μονός πόλος (SP); Τριπλός πόλος (3P); Άλλο
it: Numero di poli dell'interruttore: Doppio polo (DP); Polo singolo (SP); Triplo polo (3P); Altro
sv: Antal switchpoler: Tvåpolig (DP); Enpolig (SP); Trepolig (3P); Övrigt
fr: Nombre de pôles du commutateur: Bipolaire (DP); Unipolaire (SP); Tripolaire (3P); Autre
pt-BR: Número de polos do interruptor: Bipolar (DP); Unipolar (SP); Tripolar (3P); Outro
nl: Aantal schakelaarpolen: Dubbelpolig (DP); Enkelpolig (SP); Driepolig (3P); Overig
lt-LT: Jungiklio polių skaičius: Dviejų polių (DP); Vieno polio (SP); Trijų polių (3P); Kita
zh-TW: 開關極數: 雙極 (DP); 單極 (SP); 三極 (3P); 其他
tr: Anahtar kutup sayısı: Çift kutuplu (DP); Tek kutuplu (SP); Üç kutuplu (3P); Diğer